Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.420

Notice—Common address—Address defined—Shareholders consent.

(1) A corporation has delivered written notice or any other report or statement to all shareholders of record who share a common address if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The corporation delivers one copy of the notice, report, or statement to the common address;

(b) The corporation addresses the notice, report, or statement to the shareholders who share that address either as a group or to each of the shareholders individually or in any other manner to which each of those shareholders has consented; and

(c) Each of those shareholders consents to delivery of a single copy of such notice, report, or statement to the shareholders' common address.

(2) For purposes of this section, "address" means a street address, a post office box number, a facsimile telephone number, an address, location, or system for electronic transmissions, an electronic mail address, or another similar destination to which documents are delivered.

(3) Any consent described in subsection (1) of this section is revocable by any shareholder who delivers written notice of revocation to the corporation. If the written notice of revocation is delivered, the corporation must begin providing individual notices, reports, or statements to the revoking shareholder within thirty days after delivery of the written notice of revocation.

(4) Any shareholder who fails to object by written notice to the corporation, within 60 days of written notice by the corporation of its intention to deliver single copies of notices, reports, or statements to shareholders who share a common address as permitted by subsection (1) of this section, will be deemed to have consented to receiving single copies at the common address, on condition that the notice of intention explains that consent may be revoked and the method for revoking consent.

[ 2021 c 84 s 3; 2020 c 57 s 41; 2003 c 35 s 1.]